Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $163,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of labor and industry for one added full-time equivalent position to support activities under the Safe Workplaces for Meat and Poultry Processing Workers Act under Minnesota Statutes, sections 179.87 to 179.877. new text end